Washington statutes.
RCW 19.85.070

Small business economic impact statement—Notice of proposed rule.

When any rule is proposed for which a small business economic impact statement is required, the adopting agency must provide notice to small businesses of the proposed rule through:

(1) Direct notification of known interested small businesses or trade organizations affected by the proposed rule;

(2) Providing information of the proposed rule making to publications likely to be obtained by small businesses of the types affected by the proposed rule; and

(3) Posting on the agency website.

[ 2011 c 249 s 3; 1992 c 197 s 1.]